Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1777.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7501(b) and (d) of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 7501. General authority of political subdivisions.* * *(b) Declaration of disaster emergency.--A local disaster 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 emergency may be declared by the governing body of a political subdivision upon finding a disaster has occurred or is imminent. The governing body of a political subdivision may authorize the mayor or other chief executive officer to declare a local disaster emergency subject to ratification by the governing body. The declaration shall not be continued or renewed for a period in excess of seven days except by [or with the consent] resolution of the governing body of the political subdivision[.] for an initial period not to exceed 21 days. Necessary subsequent periods of continuation or renewal not exceeding 21 days shall be authorized by resolution. Any order or proclamation declaring, continuing or terminating a local disaster emergency shall be given prompt and general publicity and shall be filed promptly with the agency. The effect of a declaration of a local disaster emergency is to activate the response and recovery aspects of any and all applicable local emergency management plans and to authorize the furnishing of aid and assistance thereunder.* * *(d) Temporary suspension of formal requirements.--Each political subdivision included in a declaration of disaster emergency declared by either the Governor or the governing body of the political subdivision affected by the disaster emergency is authorized to exercise the powers vested under this section in the light of the exigencies of the emergency situation without regard to time-consuming procedures and formalities prescribed by law (excepting mandatory constitutional requirements) pertaining to the performance of public work, entering into contracts, the incurring of obligations, the employment of temporary workers, the rental of equipment, the 20250HB1777PN2184 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 purchase of supplies and materials, the levying of taxes and the appropriation and expenditure of public funds. [Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governing body of a political subdivision shall not be required to have a quorum physically present at any one location in order to conduct business if a quorum is otherwise established by the participating members through an authorized telecommunication device.](d.1) Meeting modifications during disaster emergency.--During a disaster emergency, the governing body of a political subdivision shall not be required to have a quorum physically present at any one location in order to conduct business if a quorum is otherwise established by the participating members through an authorized telecommunication device. The provisions of 53 Pa.C.S. § 1122.1 (relating to emergency meetings by authorized telecommunications device) shall apply to any meeting held by the governing body of a municipality under this section.* * *Section 2. Section 1121 of Title 53 is amended to read:§ 1121. Scope of subchapter.This subchapter applies to all [political subdivisions] municipalities.Section 3. Title 53 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1121.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Authorized telecommunications device." The term includes any device which permits, at a minimum, audio communication between individuals."Disaster emergency." A disaster emergency declared under 35 20250HB1777PN2184 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pa.C.S. § 7301 (relating to general authority of Governor) or 7501 (relating to general authority of political subdivisions) that directly impacts a municipality's ability to provide services or hold a regular or special meeting of the governing body of the municipality.Section 4. Section 1122 of Title 53 is amended to read:§ 1122. Establishment and designation.(a) Meetings.--Whenever, due to [an] a disaster emergency [resulting from the effects of enemy attack or the anticipated effects of a threatened enemy attack, it becomes imprudent, inexpedient or impossible to conduct the affairs of local government at the regular or usual place, the governing body of each political subdivision of this Commonwealth may meet at any place within or without the territorial limits of the political subdivision.], it is unsafe, hazardous to human health or impossible to conduct a regular or special meeting at the location where the municipality's meetings are regularly held, the governing body of each municipality of this Commonwealth may meet at any place within the territorial limits of the municipality, within the territorial limits of an adjacent municipality or another location as near the municipality as practical. The meeting may be held on the call of the presiding officer [or any two members of the governing body], or an emergency interim successor designated under section 1135 (relating to emergency interim successors for local officers) if the presiding officer is incapacitated or unavailable, and shall proceed to establish and designate, by ordinance, resolution or other manner, alternate or substitute sites or places as the emergency temporary location or locations of government where all or any part of the public business may be transacted and 20250HB1777PN2184 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 conducted during the emergency situation. These sites or places may be within or without the territorial limits of the [political subdivision] municipality and may be within or without this Commonwealth. Except in the case when it is unsafe, hazardous to human health or impossible, the governing body shall post information on how to access the meeting and the meeting's agenda at the entrance of the location where the municipality's meetings are regularly held.(b) Extended authorization prohibited.--The authorization to conduct meetings under subsection (a) shall expire after the 21st consecutive day following the disaster emergency declaration unless the governing body of the municipality establishes by resolution that: (1) the conditions necessitating the disaster emergency declaration still exist to the extent that a meeting within the municipality would be unsafe;(2) the meeting location outside of the municipality is necessary because no suitable place to hold a meeting exists within the municipality; or(3) it is essential to comply with a disaster emergency declaration or proclamation of the Governor as extended by the General Assembly.Section 5. Title 53 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1122.1. Emergency meetings by authorized telecommunications device.(a) Authorization.--Whenever the governing body of a municipality is required to establish a quorum of members physically present to conduct hearings, meetings, proceedings or other business, the governing body may conduct its business exclusively through the use of an authorized telecommunications 20250HB1777PN2184 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 device only during a disaster emergency and only if the conditions that have rendered a meeting with the physical presence of the participants unsafe, hazardous to human health or impossible would be alleviated through the use of an authorized telecommunications device.(b) Quorum.--A hearing, meeting, proceeding or other business conducted through an authorized telecommunications device under this subsection shall not require the physical presence at a meeting location of a quorum of the participating members if a quorum is otherwise established by the participating members through the authorized telecommunications device.(c) Advance notice.-- Unless prohibited by exigent circumstances, the governing body of a municipality shall post no less than 24 hours advance notice of each meeting conducted under subsection (a) on the entity's publicly accessible Internet website, if any, or in an advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation, or both. Public notice shall include the date, time, technology to be used and public participation information as provided under subsection (d). The governing body shall comply with any other notification requirement of 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings) to the extent practicable. Except in the case when it is unsafe, hazardous to human health or impossible, the governing body shall post the meeting agenda and information on how to access the meeting under subsection (a) at the entrance of the location where the municipality's meetings are regularly held.(d) Public participation.--To the extent practicable, the governing body of a municipality shall allow for public participation in a meeting, hearing or proceeding through an 20250HB1777PN2184 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authorized telecommunications device.(e) Extended emergency meeting authorizations prohibited.-- The authorization to conduct meetings by authorized telecommunications device under this section shall expire after the 21st consecutive day following the disaster emergency declaration unless the governing body of the municipality establishes by resolution that meeting by authorized telecommunications device is essential to comply with a disaster emergency declaration or proclamation of the Governor as extended by the General Assembly.Section 6. Section 1123 of Title 53 is repealed:[§ 1123. Exercise of powers and functions.During the period when the public business is being conducted at the emergency temporary location or locations, the governing body and other officers of a political subdivision of this Commonwealth shall exercise at the location or locations all of the executive, legislative and judicial powers and functions conferred upon the governing body and officers by law. These powers and functions may be exercised in the light of the exigencies of the emergency situation without regard to time-consuming procedures and formalities prescribed by law and pertaining to them, and all acts of the governing body and officers shall be as valid and binding as if performed within the territorial limits of their political subdivision.]Section 7. Section 1132 of Title 53 is amended to read:§ 1132. Declaration of policy.[Because of the existing possibility of attack upon the United States of unprecedented size and destructiveness and in order, in the event of such an attack, to] To assure continuity of government through legally constituted authority and 20250HB1777PN2184 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 responsibility in offices of the municipalities of this Commonwealth, to provide for the effective operation of government during [an] a disaster emergency and to facilitate the early resumption of functions temporarily suspended, it is found and declared to be necessary to provide for emergency interim succession to offices of the municipalities of this Commonwealth in the event the incumbents and their deputies authorized to exercise all of the powers and discharge the duties of these offices, referred to in this subchapter as deputies, are unavailable to exercise the powers and perform the duties of these offices.Section 8. The definition of "attack" in section 1133 of Title 53 is amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 1133. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:["Attack." Any attack on the United States which causes or may cause substantial damage or injury to civilian persons or property in any manner by sabotage or by the use of bombs, missiles or shellfire or by atomic, radiological, chemical, bacteriological or biological means or other weapons or processes.]"Disaster emergency." A disaster emergency declared under 35 Pa.C.S. § 7301 (relating to general authority of Governor) or 7501 (relating to general authority of political subdivisions).* * *Section 9. Section 1134 of Title 53 is repealed:[§ 1134. Enabling authority for emergency interim successors 20250HB1777PN2184 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for local offices.With respect to local offices for which the legislative bodies of municipalities may enact resolutions or ordinances relative to the manner in which vacancies will be filled or temporary appointments to office made, the legislative bodies are authorized to enact resolutions or ordinances providing for emergency interim successors to offices. The resolutions and ordinances shall not be inconsistent with this subchapter.]Section 10. Sections 1135 and 1137 of Title 53 are amended to read:§ 1135. Emergency interim successors for local officers.[This section is applicable to officers of municipalities not included in section 1134 (relating to enabling authority for emergency interim successors for local offices).] Each officer[, subject to any regulations as the executive head of the municipality may issue, shall] may designate by title[, if feasible, or by named person] one or more emergency interim successors and specify their order of succession. The officer shall review and revise, as necessary, designations made pursuant to this subchapter. [The officer will designate a sufficient number of persons so that there will be not less than three deputies or emergency interim successors or any combination of them.] If any officer or deputy of any municipality is unavailable, the powers of the office shall be exercised and the duties discharged by his designated emergency interim successors in the order specified. The emergency interim successors, in the order specified, shall exercise the powers and discharge the duties of the office to which designated until the vacancy is filled in accordance with the Constitution of Pennsylvania or statutes or until the officer, or his deputy or 20250HB1777PN2184 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a preceding emergency interim successor, ceases to be unavailable.§ 1137. Succession period.Emergency interim successors may exercise the powers and discharge the duties of an office as authorized in this subchapter only [after an attack has occurred. The General Assembly, by concurrent resolution, may terminate the] during a disaster emergency. The authority of the emergency interim successors to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of office as provided under this subchapter [.] shall terminate on the selection, appointment or election of a permanent successor as required by law.Section 11. Section 1138 of Title 53 is repealed:[§ 1138. Term and removal of designees.Until the persons designated as emergency interim successors are authorized to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of an office in accordance with this subchapter, including section 1137 (relating to succession period), these persons may be removed or replaced by the designating authority at any time, with or without cause.]Section 12. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1777PN2184 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021